Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-222.03
Fire chief; annual report; contents; report to city council.

(1) In addition to such other duties as may be performed by the fire chief employed pursuant to section 16-222.02, he or she shall keep and maintain full and complete records regarding the twelve-month period ending thirty days prior to the annual report of the chief to the city council as provided for in subsection (2) of this section. Such records include, but are not limited to, the number of volunteers in active volunteer service providing emergency response services to the city including their ages, the amount and type of training received by each volunteer during the course of his or her time of service as an active volunteer, the number of new volunteers recruited during such period, the number of volunteers who ceased to be active volunteers during that period, the basic information regarding each volunteer specified in section 35-1309.01, the number and nature of calls or requests for emergency services, the response time for each call, to be calculated from the time of receipt of the dispatch to the time of arrival of the first fire or rescue emergency response vehicle at the site of the request, the number of volunteers responding to each call, and the time each call was received. The city council may specify any additional information to be gathered or collected by the fire chief or as the fire chief may recommend.

(2) The fire chief shall collate and analyze the information gathered pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and shall, no less than once in any twelve-month period, on a date specified by the city council, provide a report to the city council at a regular council meeting on the prior year's experience regarding the volunteer department and shall make such recommendations as he or she deems appropriate.

Laws 2008, LB1096, § 3.